lexd_components/hye-verbs_eanc.lexd
##Simple regular verbs
LEXICON VerbRootE(2) 		#Class 1 երգել and 2 քաղել
թերասել:թերաս <tv>
ծանուցանել:ծանուցան <tv>
փայլ-փայլել:փայլ-փայլ <iv>
թքել-մրել:թքել-մր <tv>
թքել-մրել:թքել-մր <tv>
բզել:բզ <tv>
գզել:գզ <tv>
դզել:դզ <tv>
լզել:լզ <tv>
խզել:խզ <tv>
կզել:կզ <iv>
մզել:մզ <tv>
բթել:բթ <iv>
խթել:խթ <tv>
կթել:կթ <tv>
ոթել:ոթ <tv>
բլել:բլ <iv>
գլել:գլ <tv>
զլել:զլ <tv>
զլել:զլ <tv>
խլել:խլ <tv>
ծլել:ծլ <iv>
կլել:կլ <iv>
շլել:շլ <iv>
փլել:փլ <tv>
փլել:փլ <tv>
ախել:ախ <tv>
ախել:ախ <tv>
բխել:բխ <iv>
թխել:թխ <tv>
խխել:խխ <tv>
ծխել:ծխ <tv>
մխել:մխ <tv>
ռխել:ռխ <tv>
ածել:ած <tv>
գծել:գծ <tv>
լծել:լծ <tv>
ծծել:ծծ <tv>
կծել:կծ <tv>
օծել:օծ <tv>
լկել:լկ <iv>
կկել:կկ <iv>
ճկել:ճկ <tv>
ճկել:ճկ <tv>
սկել:սկ <iv>
ահել:ահ <iv>
աղել:աղ <tv>
կղել:կղ <iv>
հղել:հղ <iv>
ճղել:ճղ <tv>
մղել:մղ <iv>
սղել:սղ <iv>
աճել:աճ <iv>
խճել:խճ <tv>
կճել:կճ <tv>
լմել:լմ <tv>
խմել:խմ <tv>
գնել:գն <tv>
էնել:էն <iv>
լնել:լն <iv>
սնել:սն <tv>
քնել:քն <iv>
աշել:աշ <tv>
մշել:մշ <iv>
նշել:նշ <tv>
շշել:շշ <tv>
քշել:քշ <tv>
աչել:աչ <iv>
փչել:փչ <tv>
կպել:կպ <iv>
հպել:հպ <tv>
հպել:հպ <tv>
ճպել:ճպ <tv>
տպել:տպ <tv>
էջել:էջ <tv>
գռել:գռ <tv>
եռել:եռ <tv>
լռել:լռ <iv>
ծռել:ծռ <tv>
կռել:կռ <tv>
չռել:չռ <tv>
փռել:փռ <tv>
թսել:թս <iv>
լսել:լս <tv>
քսել:քս <tv>
ատել:ատ <tv>
բտել:բտ <tv>
զտել:զտ <tv>
էտել:էտ <tv>
ժտել:ժտ <tv>
կտել:կտ <tv>
ճտել:ճտ <iv>
ստել:ստ <iv>
փտել:փտ <iv>
բրել:բր <tv>
գրել:գր <tv>
էրել:էր <tv>
թրել:թր <tv>
ժրել:ժր <tv>
խրել:խր <tv>
ծրել:ծր <tv>
ծրել:ծր <tv>
կրել:կր <tv>
հրել:հր <tv>
ջրել:ջր <tv>
սրել:սր <tv>
ցրել:ցր <tv>
գցել:գց <tv>
խցել:խց <tv>
կցել:կց <tv>
ցցել:ցց <tv>
թևել:թև <iv>
ձևել:ձև <tv>
տևել:տև <iv>
ափել:ափ <tv>
եփել:եփ <tv>
լփել:լփ <tv>
խփել:խփ <tv>
ծփել:ծփ <tv>
շփել:շփ <tv>
դքել:դք <tv>
թքել:թք <tv>
թքել:թք <tv>
լքել:լք <tv>
կքել:կք <iv>
փքել:փք <tv>
հազել:հազ <iv>
նազել:նազ <iv>
սազել:սազ <iv>
վազել:վազ <iv>
լեզել:լեզ <tv>
խեզել:խեզ <tv>
դիզել:դիզ <tv>
լիզել:լիզ <tv>
կիզել:կիզ <tv>
միզել:միզ <iv>
ճլզել:ճլզ <iv>
պլզել:պլզ <tv>
կկզել:կկզ <iv>
լղզել:լղզ <tv>
լմզել:լմզ <tv>
գոզել:գոզ <iv>
պպզել:պպզ <iv>
տռզել:տռզ <iv>
ուզել:ուզ <tv>
թաթել:թաթ <tv>
ծաթել:ծաթ <iv>
կաթել:կաթ <iv>
ճաթել:ճաթ <iv>
վաթել:վաթ <tv>
ցաթել:ցաթ <iv>
խեթել:խեթ <tv>
փթթել:փթթ <iv>
քթթել:քթթ <iv>
ձիթել:ձիթ <tv>
շիթել:շիթ <iv>
վիթել:վիթ <tv>
բլթել:բլթ <tv>
ծկթել:ծկթ <iv>
թղթել:թղթ <tv>
ճմթել:ճմթ <tv>
բոթել:բոթ <tv>
խոթել:խոթ <tv>
կոթել:կոթ <tv>
առթել:առթ <tv>
բռթել:բռթ <iv>
խռթել:խռթ <iv>
կռթել:կռթ <iv>
չռթել:չռթ <tv>
բրթել:բրթ <tv>
երթել:երթ <iv>
խրթել:խրթ <tv>
կրթել:կրթ <tv>
չրթել:չրթ <tv>
ժաժել:ժաժ <tv>
կաժել:կաժ <tv>
մաժել:մաժ <tv>
խեժել:խեժ <tv>
խեժել:խեժ <tv>
բժժել:բժժ <iv>
վիժել:վիժ <tv>
դրժել:դրժ <tv>
թալել:թալ <tv>
ծալել:ծալ <tv>
կալել:կալ <tv>
հալել:հալ <tv>
մալել:մալ <tv>
նալել:նալ <tv>
մգլել:մգլ <tv>
գելել:գել <tv>
թելել:թել <tv>
ցելել:ցել <tv>
գլլել:գլլ <tv>
կլլել:կլլ <iv>
ճխլել:ճխլ <tv>
փխլել:փխլ <iv>
ճմլել:ճմլ <tv>
խշլել:խշլ <tv>
զոլել:զոլ <tv>
ցոլել:ցոլ <iv>
գջլել:գջլ <tv>
ավլել:ավլ <tv>
բախել:բախ <tv>
բախել:բախ <tv>
ծախել:ծախ <tv>
կախել:կախ <tv>
ջախել:ջախ <tv>
վախել:վախ <iv>
կեխել:կեխ <tv>
մեխել:մեխ <tv>
նեխել:նեխ <iv>
ցեխել:ցեխ <tv>
ժժխել:ժժխ <tv>
գլխել:գլխ <tv>
աղխել:աղխ <iv>
բղխել:բղխ <iv>
խմխել:խմխ <iv>
ժշխել:ժշխ <tv>
իշխել:իշխ <tv>
իշխել:իշխ <tv>
թոխել:թոխ <tv>
կոխել:կոխ <tv>
փոխել:փոխ <tv>
պչխել:պչխ <tv>
մսխել:մսխ <tv>
փսխել:փսխ <tv>
փսխել:փսխ <tv>
արխել:արխ <tv>
խածել:խած <tv>
հածել:հած <iv>
տածել:տած <tv>
ծեծել:ծեծ <tv>
հեծել:հեծ <iv>
գծծել:գծծ <tv>
խծծել:խծծ <tv>
կծծել:կծծ <tv>
հծծել:հծծ <tv>
եղծել:եղծ <tv>
պղծել:պղծ <tv>
կոծել:կոծ <iv>
թրծել:թրծ <tv>
կրծել:կրծ <tv>
զօծել:զօծ <tv>
դակել:դակ <tv>
թակել:թակ <tv>
լակել:լակ <tv>
ծակել:ծակ <tv>
հակել:հակ <tv>
փակել:փակ <tv>
քակել:քակ <tv>
բեկել:բեկ <tv>
թզկել:թզկ <iv>
խթկել:խթկ <tv>
լլկել:լլկ <tv>
ծլկել:ծլկ <iv>
սլկել:սլկ <iv>
զխկել:զխկ <iv>
լխկել:լխկ <tv>
լխկել:լխկ <tv>
խծկել:խծկ <tv>
կծկել:կծկ <tv>
հղկել:հղկ <tv>
սղկել:սղկ <iv>
լմկել:լմկ <tv>
խնկել:խնկ <tv>
ծնկել:ծնկ <iv>
տնկել:տնկ <tv>
խշկել:խշկ <iv>
պշկել:պշկ <iv>
կոկել:կոկ <tv>
պոկել:պոկ <tv>
ջոկել:ջոկ <tv>
խռկել:խռկ <tv>
կռկել:կռկ <iv>
թսկել:թսկ <iv>
հսկել:հսկ <tv>
ոսկել:ոսկ <tv>
շտկել:շտկ <tv>
պտկել:պտկ <iv>
արկել:արկ <tv>
գրկել:գրկ <tv>
զրկել:զրկ <iv>
խրկել:խրկ <tv>
կրկել:կրկ <tv>
ղրկել:ղրկ <tv>
մրկել:մրկ <tv>
պրկել:պրկ <tv>
փրկել:փրկ <tv>
խցկել:խցկ <tv>
բահել:բահ <tv>
շահել:շահ <tv>
պահել:պահ <tv>
սահել:սահ <iv>
զոհել:զոհ <tv>
խոհել:խոհ <iv>
շոհել:շոհ <tv>
հնձել:հնձ <tv>
խրձել:խրձ <tv>
գաղել:գաղ <tv>
դաղել:դաղ <tv>
թաղել:թաղ <tv>
կաղել:կաղ <iv>
ճաղել:ճաղ <tv>
մաղել:մաղ <tv>
շաղել:շաղ <tv>
պաղել:պաղ <iv>
դեղել:դեղ <tv>
զեղել:զեղ <tv>
թեղել:թեղ <tv>
խեղել:խեղ <tv>
հեղել:հեղ <tv>
նեղել:նեղ <iv>
շեղել:շեղ <tv>
պեղել:պեղ <tv>
կծղել:կծղ <iv>
պճղել:պճղ <tv>
գողել:գող <tv>
դողել:դող <tv>
թողել:թող <tv>
լողել:լող <tv>
լողել:լող <tv>
խողել:խող <tv>
կողել:կող <iv>
հողել:հող <tv>
տողել:տող <tv>
ցողել:ցող <tv>
քողել:քող <tv>
խտղել:խտղ <tv>
կտղել:կտղ <iv>
պտղել:պտղ <tv>
պտղել:պտղ <tv>
դաճել:դաճ <tv>
հաճել:հաճ <iv>
խիճել:խիճ <tv>
վիճել:վիճ <iv>
լղճել:լղճ <iv>
խճճել:խճճ <tv>
կոճել:կոճ <tv>
ճոճել:ճոճ <tv>
կպճել:կպճ <tv>
կռճել:կռճ <iv>
կրճել:կրճ <iv>
գամել:գամ <tv>
ժամել:ժամ <iv>
լամել:լամ <tv>
ծամել:ծամ <tv>
կամել:կամ <tv>
համել:համ <tv>
քամել:քամ <tv>
դդմել:դդմ <iv>
ճեմել:ճեմ <iv>
կզմել:կզմ <iv>
ճզմել:ճզմ <tv>
դիմել:դիմ <iv>
թխմել:թխմ <tv>
խխմել:խխմ <iv>
շշմել:շշմ <iv>
գոմել:գոմ <tv>
մոմել:մոմ <tv>
կռմել:կռմ <iv>
թրմել:թրմ <tv>
որմել:որմ <tv>
բայել:բայ <iv>
հայել:հայ <tv>
մայել:մայ <iv>
նայել:նայ <tv>
նայել:նայ <tv>
սայել:սայ <tv>
վայել:վայ <iv>
ցայել:ցայ <tv>
փայել:փայ <tv>
թեյել:թեյ <iv>
կոյել:կոյ <iv>
շոյել:շոյ <tv>
բանել:բան <iv>
գանել:գան <tv>
գանել:գան <tv>
կանել:կան <tv>
հանել:հան <tv>
մանել:ման <tv>
վանել:վան <tv>
ցանել:ցան <tv>
ճգնել:ճգն <iv>
օգնել:օգն <iv>
հենել:հեն <tv>
կթնել:կթն <iv>
մթնել:մթն <iv>
զինել:զին <tv>
հինել:հին <tv>
շինել:շին <tv>
կլնել:կլն <iv>
քծնել:քծն <iv>
ակնել:ակն <tv>
եղնել:եղն <iv>
պճնել:պճն <iv>
ժմնել:ժմն <iv>
զննել:զնն <tv>
քննել:քնն <tv>
թշնել:թշն <iv>
պշնել:պշն <iv>
թոնել:թոն <iv>
ձոնել:ձոն <tv>
տոնել:տոն <tv>
զպնել:զպն <tv>
խպնել:խպն <iv>
բռնել:բռն <tv>
խռնել:խռն <tv>
խռնել:խռն <tv>
բսնել:բսն <iv>
կտնել:կտն <iv>
ոտնել:ոտն <tv>
փտնել:փտն <tv>
արնել:արն <tv>
արնել:արն <tv>
երնել:երն <tv>
ցփնել:ցփն <tv>
բքնել:բքն <iv>
թքնել:թքն <tv>
թքնել:թքն <tv>
լքնել:լքն <iv>
տքնել:տքն <iv>
խաշել:խաշ <tv>
ճաշել:ճաշ <iv>
մաշել:մաշ <tv>
տաշել:տաշ <tv>
քաշել:քաշ <tv>
հիշել:հիշ <tv>
խլշել:խլշ <tv>
պլշել:պլշ <tv>
ճնշել:ճնշ <tv>
հոշել:հոշ <tv>
ապշել:ապշ <iv>
շրշել:շրշ <iv>
խաչել:խաչ <tv>
հաչել:հաչ <iv>
շաչել:շաչ <iv>
պաչել:պաչ <tv>
դդչել:դդչ <iv>
բլչել:բլչ <iv>
փլչել:փլչ <iv>
կկչել:կկչ <iv>
գնչել:գնչ <iv>
թնչել:թնչ <iv>
խնչել:խնչ <tv>
կնչել:կնչ <iv>
հնչել:հնչ <iv>
շնչել:շնչ <iv>
գոչել:գոչ <iv>
կոչել:կոչ <iv>
չոչել:չոչ <iv>
քոչել:քոչ <iv>
կապել:կապ <tv>
ծեպել:ծեպ <iv>
ճեպել:ճեպ <iv>
շեպել:շեպ <tv>
սեպել:սեպ <tv>
կլպել:կլպ <tv>
թխպել:թխպ <iv>
խծպել:խծպ <tv>
կղպել:կղպ <tv>
կճպել:կճպ <tv>
ամպել:ամպ <iv>
ըմպել:ըմպ <tv>
քշպել:քշպ <tv>
թոպել:թոպ <tv>
լպպել:լպպ <tv>
խռպել:խռպ <iv>
զսպել:զսպ <tv>
գաջել:գաջ <tv>
դաջել:դաջ <tv>
հաջել:հաջ <iv>
միջել:միջ <tv>
շիջել:շիջ <iv>
խնջել:խնջ <tv>
ննջել:ննջ <iv>
ջնջել:ջնջ <tv>
փնջել:փնջ <tv>
քջջել:քջջ <iv>
թրջել:թրջ <tv>
շրջել:շրջ <iv>
շրջել:շրջ <tv>
թևջել:թևջ <iv>
թառել:թառ <iv>
խառել:խառ <tv>
հառել:հառ <tv>
ճառել:ճառ <iv>
սառել:սառ <iv>
վառել:վառ <tv>
կեռել:կեռ <tv>
հեռել:հեռ <iv>
ծթռել:ծթռ <iv>
գժռել:գժռ <iv>
խժռել:խժռ <tv>
ճկռել:ճկռ <iv>
տկռել:տկռ <iv>
ահռել:ահռ <iv>
աճռել:աճռ <tv>
պճռել:պճռ <tv>
վճռել:վճռ <tv>
ճմռել:ճմռ <tv>
կշռել:կշռ <tv>
զոռել:զոռ <tv>
զոռել:զոռ <tv>
խոռել:խոռ <tv>
կոռել:կոռ <tv>
պտռել:պտռ <tv>
ուռել:ուռ <iv>
սփռել:սփռ <tv>
բքռել:բքռ <iv>
դասել:դաս <tv>
թասել:թաս <iv>
կասել:կաս <tv>
կասել:կաս <tv>
լեսել:լես <tv>
կիսել:կիս <tv>
թխսել:թխս <tv>
լոսել:լոս <tv>
խոսել:խոս <tv>
խոսել:խոս <tv>
հոսել:հոս <iv>
մրսել:մրս <iv>
ուսել:ուս <tv>
դատել:դատ <tv>
դատել:դատ <tv>
զատել:զատ <tv>
հատել:հատ <tv>
պատել:պատ <iv>
ձգտել:ձգտ <iv>
ճետել:ճետ <iv>
նետել:նետ <tv>
փետել:փետ <tv>
գժտել:գժտ <tv>
գժտել:գժտ <tv>
օժտել:օժտ <iv>
դիտել:դիտ <tv>
կիտել:կիտ <tv>
միտել:միտ <tv>
միտել:միտ <tv>
վիտել:վիտ <tv>
ժխտել:ժխտ <tv>
ճխտել:ճխտ <tv>
ջխտել:ջխտ <tv>
կնտել:կնտ <iv>
բշտել:բշտ <tv>
բշտել:բշտ <tv>
խշտել:խշտ <tv>
կշտել:կշտ <tv>
ճշտել:ճշտ <tv>
քշտել:քշտ <tv>
խոտել:խոտ <tv>
խոտել:խոտ <tv>
հոտել:հոտ <tv>
հոտել:հոտ <tv>
ժպտել:ժպտ <iv>
ծպտել:ծպտ <tv>
կռտել:կռտ <iv>
թստել:թստ <iv>
խստել:խստ <iv>
խտտել:խտտ <tv>
կտտել:կտտ <iv>
պտտել:պտտ <tv>
ժրտել:ժրտ <tv>
ծրտել:ծրտ <tv>
ծրտել:ծրտ <tv>
կրտել:կրտ <iv>
ցրտել:ցրտ <iv>
լարել:լար <tv>
խարել:խար <tv>
ծարել:ծար <iv>
կարել:կար <tv>
հարել:հար <iv>
հարել:հար <tv>
ճարել:ճար <tv>
մարել:մար <iv>
շարել:շար <tv>
պարել:պար <iv>
սարել:սար <tv>
վարել:վար <tv>
վարել:վար <tv>
փարել:փար <tv>
քարել:քար <tv>
գերել:գեր <tv>
ծերել:ծեր <tv>
ծերել:ծեր <tv>
մերել:մեր <tv>
ներել:ներ <tv>
սերել:սեր <tv>
քերել:քեր <tv>
եզրել:եզր <tv>
սթրել:սթր <tv>
տիրել:տիր <tv>
տխրել:տխր <iv>
փխրել:փխր <tv>
բհրել:բհր <tv>
կճրել:կճր <tv>
թմրել:թմր <iv>
խմրել:խմր <iv>
ծմրել:ծմր <iv>
այրել:այր <tv>
ծնրել:ծնր <iv>
խշրել:խշր <tv>
փշրել:փշր <tv>
զորել:զոր <tv>
թորել:թոր <tv>
թորել:թոր <tv>
խորել:խոր <tv>
ծորել:ծոր <tv>
ծորել:ծոր <tv>
կորել:կոր <tv>
հորել:հոր <tv>
նորել:նոր <tv>
չորել:չոր <tv>
սորել:սոր <iv>
փորել:փոր <tv>
քորել:քոր <tv>
գչրել:գչր <tv>
պչրել:պչր <tv>
ապրել:ապր <iv>
կպրել:կպր <tv>
ավրել:ավր <tv>
խտրել:խտր <tv>
խտրել:խտր <tv>
կտրել:կտր <tv>
պտրել:պտր <tv>
կցրել:կցր <tv>
այցել:այց <iv>
ցնցել:ցնց <tv>
բոցել:բոց <tv>
բոցել:բոց <tv>
գոցել:գոց <tv>
խոցել:խոց <tv>
կտցել:կտց <tv>
մրցել:մրց <iv>
արևել:արև <tv>
արևել:արև <tv>
երևել:երև <iv>
թրևել:թրև <iv>
դափել:դափ <tv>
դափել:դափ <tv>
թափել:թափ <tv>
լափել:լափ <tv>
ծափել:ծափ <tv>
ծափել:ծափ <tv>
կափել:կափ <tv>
շափել:շափ <iv>
չափել:չափ <tv>
տափել:տափ <tv>
տափել:տափ <tv>
ծեփել:ծեփ <tv>
գմփել:գմփ <tv>
դմփել:դմփ <tv>
դոփել:դոփ <iv>
կոփել:կոփ <tv>
տոփել:տոփ <tv>
գռփել:գռփ <tv>
կռփել:կռփ <iv>
գրփել:գրփ <tv>
ղրփել:ղրփ <tv>
լաքել:լաք <tv>
ճաքել:ճաք <iv>
թեքել:թեք <tv>
ծեքել:ծեք <tv>
ծեքել:ծեք <tv>
շեքել:շեք <iv>
կզքել:կզք <iv>
ծծքել:ծծք <tv>
չմքել:չմք <iv>
սմքել:սմք <iv>
կնքել:կնք <tv>
թոքել:թոք <iv>
լոքել:լոք <iv>
չոքել:չոք <iv>
քոքել:քոք <tv>
աչքել:աչք <iv>
ոտքել:ոտք <iv>
թրքել:թրք <iv>
վռազել:վռազ <iv>
ավազել:ավազ <tv>
նվազել:նվազ <iv>
երազել:երազ <tv>
բզբզել:բզբզ <tv>
խզբզել:խզբզ <tv>
դմբզել:դմբզ <tv>
գզգզել:գզգզ <tv>
ֆրեզել:ֆրեզ <tv>
երիզել:երիզ <tv>
խզխզել:խզխզ <iv>
լզմզել:լզմզ <tv>
խզմզել:խզմզ <tv>
թլոզել:թլոզ <tv>
լղոզել:լղոզ <tv>
դարզել:դարզ <tv>
մարզել:մարզ <tv>
պարզել:պարզ <tv>
պարզել:պարզ <tv>
կորզել:կորզ <tv>
խուզել:խուզ <tv>
հուզել:հուզ <tv>
սուզել:սուզ <tv>
խլաթել:խլաթ <tv>
ծկըթել:ծկըթ <iv>
խեթթել:խեթթ <tv>
խթխթել:խթխթ <tv>
կզկթել:կզկթ <iv>
կծկթել:կծկթ <tv>
ճմկթել:ճմկթ <tv>
գաղթել:գաղթ <iv>
հաղթել:հաղթ <tv>
մաղթել:մաղթ <iv>
կժմթել:կժմթ <iv>
կծմթել:կծմթ <tv>
կճմթել:կճմթ <tv>
կսմթել:կսմթ <tv>
գայթել:գայթ <iv>
ժայթել:ժայթ <iv>
խայթել:խայթ <tv>
կայթել:կայթ <iv>
ճայթել:ճայթ <iv>
պայթել:պայթ <iv>
սայթել:սայթ <iv>
վայթել:վայթ <tv>
դանթել:դանթ <iv>
կանթել:կանթ <tv>
շանթել:շանթ <tv>
չանթել:չանթ <tv>
աղոթել:աղոթ <iv>
ամոթել:ամոթ <tv>
դռոթել:դռոթ <iv>
շփոթել:շփոթ <iv>
ճմռթել:ճմռթ <tv>
ճոռթել:ճոռթ <tv>
պոռթել:պոռթ <tv>
զավթել:զավթ <tv>
նավթել:նավթ <iv>
թարթել:թարթ <tv>
թարթել:թարթ <tv>
կարթել:կարթ <tv>
հարթել:հարթ <tv>
քարթել:քարթ <tv>
թերթել:թերթ <tv>
փերթել:փերթ <tv>
քերթել:քերթ <tv>
սկրթել:սկրթ <iv>
մորթել:մորթ <tv>
շորթել:շորթ <tv>
չութել:չութ <tv>
պատժել:պատժ <tv>
կարժել:կարժ <tv>
շարժել:շարժ <tv>
վարժել:վարժ <tv>
մերժել:մերժ <tv>
բուժել:բուժ <tv>
գուժել:գուժ <tv>
ժուժել:ժուժ <iv>
խուժել:խուժ <iv>
տուժել:տուժ <tv>
գդալել:գդալ <tv>
սղալել:սղալ <iv>
էմալել:էմալ <tv>
բլբլել:բլբլ <tv>
բլբլել:բլբլ <tv>
բմբլել:բմբլ <tv>
ածելել:ածել <tv>
ավելել:ավել <tv>
ածիլել:ածիլ <tv>
թալլել:թալլ <tv>
ծալլել:ծալլ <tv>
բախլել:բախլ <iv>
խլխլել:խլխլ <tv>
խլխլել:խլխլ <tv>
ծլծլել:ծլծլ <iv>
շշկլել:շշկլ <iv>
մամլել:մամլ <tv>
փայլել:փայլ <iv>
քայլել:քայլ <iv>
կլոլել:կլոլ <tv>
թապլել:թապլ <tv>
հասլել:հասլ <iv>
ձուլել:ձուլ <tv>
սուլել:սուլ <tv>
սուլել:սուլ <tv>
թափլել:թափլ <tv>
փլփլել:փլփլ <iv>
թոփլել:թոփլ <iv>
բրախել:բրախ <tv>
խրախել:խրախ <iv>
թալխել:թալխ <iv>
բաղխել:բաղխ <tv>
բաղխել:բաղխ <tv>
գռմխել:գռմխ <tv>
ջրմխել:ջրմխ <tv>
կանխել:կանխ <tv>
